District of Columbia statutes.
16-909.05

Mayor authorized to designate other sites for paternity acknowledgment program.

The Mayor is authorized to establish voluntary paternity establishment services at entities other than hospitals, or the Vital Records Office, by publishing a notice of such location in the D.C. Register. The Mayor may only designate entities that meet the applicable federal requirements and comply with the same requirements that apply to birthing hospitals as set forth in section 16-909.03 .

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 106(f), 48 DCR 1270
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 105(f) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 105(f) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 106(f) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).
Section 28(b)(1) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 16-901.5 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 16-901.05.